Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 30 Benefits for Dependents of Deceased Veterans, P.O.W.S., and M.I.A.S

30-30-1.
Appropriations — Purposes.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate such a sum as may be necessary, out of any money in the treasury not otherwise appropriated, for the purpose of creating and maintaining a “dependents’ education fund” from which shall be paid in whole or in part the charges for the tuition and books of such of the sons, daughters, and surviving spouses of veterans who died as the result of hostile action or a service-connected disability arising out of active service in the armed forces, or who died from any cause while such a disability was in existence, or of those who are serving in the far east and had a legal residence in this state at the time they were commissioned, warranted, enlisted, or inducted into the military or naval service of the United States and were either missing in action or are prisoners of war, provided that the next of kin has not been advised by the armed forces that the serviceperson has been released or is no longer classified as missing in action. The benefits shall be extended to dependents who are attending, or may attend, the university of Rhode Island, Rhode Island college, or any institution of higher education or technical/professional learning. The maximum aid granted shall not exceed the in-state tuition cost plus average cost of books of attending the university of Rhode Island in that year, the costs to be yearly certified by the Board of Education to the administering agency; provided, any child dependent shall enter the institution while between the ages of sixteen (16) and twenty-six (26); and provided, further, that the aid herein granted shall be available to that child for such period of time as shall equal the normal time for completing the courses regularly offered by the institution, but in no case more than four (4) years; and provided, further, that this chapter shall apply also to the children of those who are serving in the far east, but did not have legal residence in this state at the time those persons were commissioned, warranted, enlisted, or inducted into the military or naval service of the United States; provided that those children have resided in this state continuously for five (5) years and are otherwise eligible, upon the presentation to the proper administering authority of sufficient evidence that the parent qualifies the child to receive the benefits under this section; and provided, further, that, as to surviving spouses, the benefits must be utilized within a period of ten (10) years from the date eligibility is found or from the date of death of the spouse from whom eligibility is derived.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 22, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 459, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 20, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 134, § 17; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 49.

30-30-2.
Administration.

The division of higher education assistance shall be designated as the administering authority for this chapter and shall, no later than August 30, 1987, establish rules, regulations, procedures, and safeguards for the implementation of this chapter. The regulations and procedures shall include, but not be limited to, the establishment of income guidelines and academic performance criteria. No funds shall be awarded under this chapter until these regulatory and administrative measures are established.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 20, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 7, § 13.